Utah statutes.
53B-6-103.   Cooperation with nonmember institutions within the state.

As a further means of attaining a well integrated and adequate system of post-high school education in Utah, the board shall seek the cooperation of all private, denominational, and other post-high school educational institutions situated in this state which are not supported by public funds.

